Illinois, session 104th, SB166.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Foster Parent Law is amended by changing 5Section 1-15 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 520/1-15)7    Sec. 1-15. Foster parent rights. A foster parent's rights 8include, but are not limited to, the following:9        (1) The right to be treated with dignity, respect, and 10    consideration as a professional member of the child 11    welfare team.12        (2) The right to be given standardized pre-service 13    training and appropriate ongoing training to meet mutually 14    assessed needs and improve the foster parent's skills.15        (3) The right to be informed as to how to contact the 16    appropriate child placement agency in order to receive 17    information and assistance to access supportive services 18    for children in the foster parent's care.19        (4) The right to receive timely financial 20    reimbursement commensurate with the care needs of the 21    child as specified in the service plan. This shall include 22    an initial payment of $480 per child to be made within 21 23    days of a permanent placement. If the final monthly   SB0166- 2 -LRB104 03683 KTG 13707 b1    payment for a child amounts to $480 or more, the amount of 2    $480 shall be deducted from the final monthly payment. If 3    the final monthly payment amounts to less than $480, the 4    final monthly payment shall not be made. 5        (5) The right to be provided a clear, written 6    understanding of a placement agency's plan concerning the 7    placement of a child in the foster parent's home. Inherent 8    in this right is the foster parent's responsibility to 9    support activities that will promote the child's right to 10    relationships with the child's own family and cultural 11    heritage.12        (6) The right to be provided a fair, timely, and 13    impartial investigation of complaints concerning the 14    foster parent's licensure, to be provided the opportunity 15    to have a person of the foster parent's choosing present 16    during the investigation, and to be provided due process 17    during the investigation; the right to be provided the 18    opportunity to request and receive mediation or an 19    administrative review of decisions that affect licensing 20    parameters, or both mediation and an administrative 21    review; and the right to have decisions concerning a 22    licensing corrective action plan specifically explained 23    and tied to the licensing standards violated.24        (7) The right, at any time during which a child is 25    placed with the foster parent, to receive additional or 26    necessary information that is relevant to the care of the   SB0166- 3 -LRB104 03683 KTG 13707 b1    child.2        (7.5) The right to be given information concerning a 3    child (i) from the Department as required under subsection 4    (u) of Section 5 of the Children and Family Services Act 5    and (ii) from a child welfare agency as required under 6    subsection (c-5) of Section 7.4 of the Child Care Act of 7    1969. 8        (8) The right to be notified of scheduled meetings and 9    staffings concerning the foster child in order to actively 10    participate in the case planning and decision-making 11    process regarding the child, including individual service 12    planning meetings, administrative case reviews, 13    interdisciplinary staffings, and individual educational 14    planning meetings; the right to be informed of decisions 15    made by the courts or the child welfare agency concerning 16    the child; the right to provide input concerning the plan 17    of services for the child and to have that input given full 18    consideration in the same manner as information presented 19    by any other professional on the team; and the right to 20    communicate with other professionals who work with the 21    foster child within the context of the team, including 22    therapists, physicians, attending health care 23    professionals, and teachers.24        (9) The right to be given, in a timely and consistent 25    manner, any information a caseworker has regarding the 26    child and the child's family which is pertinent to the   SB0166- 4 -LRB104 03683 KTG 13707 b1    care and needs of the child and to the making of a 2    permanency plan for the child. Disclosure of information 3    concerning the child's family shall be limited to that 4    information that is essential for understanding the needs 5    of and providing care to the child in order to protect the 6    rights of the child's family. When a positive relationship 7    exists between the foster parent and the child's family, 8    the child's family may consent to disclosure of additional 9    information.10        (10) The right to be given reasonable written notice 11    of (i) any change in a child's case plan, (ii) plans to 12    terminate the placement of the child with the foster 13    parent, and (iii) the reasons for the change or 14    termination in placement. The notice shall be waived only 15    in cases of a court order or when the child is determined 16    to be at imminent risk of harm.17        (11) The right to be notified in a timely and complete 18    manner of all court hearings, including notice of the date 19    and time of the court hearing, the name of the judge or 20    hearing officer hearing the case, the location of the 21    hearing, and the court docket number of the case; and the 22    right to intervene in court proceedings or to seek 23    mandamus under the Juvenile Court Act of 1987.24        (12) The right to be considered as a placement option 25    when a foster child who was formerly placed with the 26    foster parent is to be re-entered into foster care, if   SB0166- 5 -LRB104 03683 KTG 13707 b1    that placement is consistent with the best interest of the 2    child and other children in the foster parent's home.3        (13) The right to have timely access to the child 4    placement agency's existing appeals process and the right 5    to be free from acts of harassment and retaliation by any 6    other party when exercising the right to appeal.7        (14) The right to be informed of the Foster Parent 8    Hotline established under Section 35.6 of the Children and 9    Family Services Act and all of the rights accorded to 10    foster parents concerning reports of misconduct by 11    Department employees, service providers, or contractors, 12    confidential handling of those reports, and investigation 13    by the Inspector General appointed under Section 35.5 of 14    the Children and Family Services Act.15        (15) The right to timely training necessary to meet 16    the hair care haircare needs of the children placed in the 17    foster parent's care. 18(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23; 103-850, eff. 1-1-25; 19revised 11-21-24.)